Vermont statutes. Title 11A Vermont Business Corporations
Subchapter 1. Short Title and Reservation of Power

§ 1.01.
Short title.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the “Vermont Business Corporation Act.”

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 1.02.
Reservation of power.

Nothing contained in this title shall give the right to impair the obligation of any charter, or any amendment thereof, granted or made prior to November 19, 1851; nor shall the General Assembly enact any law that would so affect any charter or amendment passed prior to such date. Subject to the foregoing restriction, any act creating, continuing, altering, or renewing a corporation or body politic may be repealed by the General Assembly, as the public good requires; and any such act may be altered or amended by the General Assembly, as the public good requires, if within the exception specified in section 69 of Chapter II of the Vermont Constitution.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.